Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2509 (4) 91 jm/ns/md H.F. 2509 Section 1. Section 123.49, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) Sell or dispense any alcoholic beverage on the 3 premises covered by the license, or permit its consumption 4 thereon between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m. on any day 5 of the week. This subparagraph does not apply at a commercial 6 service airport. 7 (2) For purposes of this paragraph, âcommercial service 8 airportâ means the same as defined in 49 U.S.C. Â§47102. 9 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 10 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 11 -1- HF 2509 (4) 91 jm/ns/md 1/ 1